District of Columbia statutes.
16-2106

Separate composition or compromise.

Any one of several joint debtors when their debt is overdue, may make a separate composition or compromise with their creditors, with the same effect as is provided in the case of parties by Chapter 3 of Title 41 [now chapter 3 of Title 33].

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 585, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 16-2106.
1973 Ed., § 16-2106.